Wisconsin, session 2025, AB827.
do enact as follows:AB827,13Section 1. 115.28 (44) of the statutes is created to read:AB827,2,34115.28 (44) School safety; lockdown announcement. In consultation 1with the office of school safety in the department of justice, create and make 2available to public, private, and tribal schools at no cost, a prerecorded audio 3message to announce a school lockdown.AB827,24Section 2. 118.07 (4) (bm) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB827,2,105118.07 (4) (bm) 1. An individualized safety plan for each school building and 6facility that is regularly occupied by pupils. The individualized safety plan shall 7include any real property related to the school building or facility that is regularly 8occupied by pupils. If an individualized safety plan includes a school lockdown, the 9plan shall incorporate the audio message created under s. 115.28 (44) to announce 10any school lockdown required under the plan.AB827,2,1111